New York, session 2025-2026, S3786.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision 1 of section 3627 of 2 the education law, as amended by section 7 of part A of chapter 56 of 3 the laws of 2014, are amended to read as follows: 4 (a) providing transportation for those children attending public and 5 nonpublic schools in grades kindergarten through six who remain at the 6 same school for which they are enrolled for regularly scheduled academic 7 classes or for remedial services, homework or childcare from half-past 8 nine o'clock in the morning or earlier until four o'clock in the after- 9 noon or later, on weekdays, and reside at least one mile from their 10 school of attendance for grades three through six, and at least one-half 11 mile from their school of attendance for grades kindergarten through two 12 or 13 (b) reimbursing the cost incurred by licensed transportation carriers 14 pursuant to contracts with such school district for providing transpor- 15 tation for those children attending public and nonpublic schools in 16 grades kindergarten through six who remain at the same school for which 17 they are enrolled for regularly scheduled academic classes or for reme- 18 dial services, homework or childcare from half-past nine o'clock in the 19 morning or earlier until four o'clock in the afternoon or later, on 20 weekdays, and reside at least one mile from their school of attendance 21 for grades three through six, and at least one-half mile from their 22 school of attendance for grades kindergarten through two. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07850-01-5